Washington statutes.
RCW 43.23.230

Agricultural local fund—Animal disease traceability account.

(1) The agricultural local fund is hereby established in the custody of the state treasurer. The fund shall consist of such money as is directed by law for deposit in the fund, and such other money not subject to appropriation that the department authorizes to be deposited in the fund. Any money deposited in the fund, the use of which has been restricted by law, may only be expended in accordance with those restrictions. The department may make disbursements from the fund. The fund is not subject to legislative appropriation.

(2) There is created within the agricultural local fund the animal disease traceability account which must be used to account for the costs associated with the implementation of chapter 16.36 RCW.

[ 2011 c 204 s 7; 1988 c 254 s 1.]